apertium-chv.chv.lexc
LEXICON CLIT-ÇÇĔ

%+ччӗ%<mod%>:%>%{ч%}чӗ                                         K ; ! politeness suffix
                                                               K ;

LEXICON CLIT-COP 

%+ӗ%<cop%>%<ifi%>:%>%{ч%}чӗ                                    K ; 
                                                               K ;

LEXICON CASE-NONOM

%<gen%>:%>%{Ă%}н                                               CLIT-COP   ;
%<gen%>:%>%{Ă%}н%{ː%}%>%{х%}%{и%}%{н%}                         SUBST      ;
%<dat%>:%>%{N%}%{A%}                                           CLIT-COP   ; 
%<loc%>:%>%{T%}%{A%}                                           CLIT-COP   ;  
%<loc%>%<attr%>:%>%{T%}%{A%}%>%{х%}%{и%}                       #          ; ! пӳртри, хушшинчи
%<loc%>:%>%{T%}%{A%}%>%{х%}%{и%}%{н%}                          SUBST      ; ! пӳртрисем, хушшинчисем
%<abl%>:%>%{T%}%{A%}н                                          CLIT-COP   ; 
%<ins%>:%>п%{A%}                                               CLIT-COP   ; ! юлташӗпеччӗ
%<ter%>:%>ш%{Ă%}н                                              CLIT-COP   ; 

%<all%>:%>%{N%}%{A%}%>лл%{A%}                                  K          ;
%+сӑр%<post%>:%>с%{Ă%}р                                        CLIT-COP "weight: 1.0" ;
%+ллӑ%<post%>:%>%{л%}л%{Ă%}                                    K "weight: 1.0" ;
%+ччен%<post%>:%>%{ч%}чен                                      K          ; ! FIXME: Check
%+ҫи%<post%>:%>ҫи                                              K          ; ! Атӑлҫи булварӗ

LEXICON CASE

%<nom%>:                                                       CLIT-COP   ; ! йывӑҫчӗ, градусчӗ
                                                               CASE-NONOM ;

LEXICON PLURAL

                                                               CASE ;
%<pl%>:%>се%{м%}                                               CASE ; 

LEXICON POSS-P1X-P2X

%<px1sg%>:%>%{ă%}м                                             PLURAL ;
%<px2sg%>:%>%{U%}%{н%}                                         PLURAL ;
%<px1pl%>:%>%{ă%}м%{Ă%}р                                       PLURAL ;
%<px2pl%>:%>%{Ĕ%}р                                             PLURAL ;

LEXICON POSS-P3X

%<px3sp%>:%>%{и%}%{н%}                                         PLURAL ;

LEXICON POSS-PX

                                                               POSS-P1X-P2X ;
                                                               POSS-P3X ;

LEXICON POSS

                                                               PLURAL ;
                                                               POSS-PX ;

LEXICON SUBST-SKER
! Lexicon for words that can substantivise with -скер

%+скер%<subst%>:%>скер	                                       POSS ;	! шутлаканскерне

LEXICON SUBST-I
! Lexicon for words that can substantivise with -и

! FIXME:
! -скер can take possessives.
! шутлаканскерне

!%<subst%>:%>%{и%}%{н%}                                        PLURAL ; 
%+и%<subst%>:%>%{и%}%{н%}                                      PLURAL ; 

LEXICON SUBST-SKER-I
! Lexicon for words that can substantivise with
! both -скер and -и

                                                               SUBST-SKER ; 
                                                               SUBST-I ;

LEXICON SUBST 
! Substantive lexicon for those words that substantivise
! with possessives, e.g. take (pl)-(case)

%<subst%>:                                                     PLURAL ; 

LEXICON NOMINAL
! This is the general lexicon for nominals, those words
! that can take (poss)-(pl)-(case)

                                                               POSS ; 

LEXICON NP-AL
! Разные, напр. "Роспотребнадзор"

%<np%>%<al%>:                                                  NOMINAL ;
%<np%>%<al%>%<attr%>: # ; 

LEXICON NP-AL-PX
! Compound "other" np ending in <px3sp>

%<np%>%<al%>:                                                 POSS ;

LEXICON NP-AL-LN
! Lexicon for "other" np with alternative locative in -рA (in addition to -TA).
! These are words ending in н or нь, and often also the ones ending in л or ль.

                                                               NP-AL ;
%<np%>%<al%>%<loc%>:%>р%{A%}                                   K "weight: 1.0" ; 
%<np%>%<al%>%<abl%>:%>р%{A%}н                                  K "weight: 1.0" ; 
%<np%>%<al%>%<px2sg%>%<dat%>:%>н%{A%}                          K "weight: 1.0" ; 

LEXICON NP-AL-BÜRO

:%{в%}%{☭%}                                                    NP-AL ;


LEXICON NP-TOP
! Имена мест, напр. "Тутарстан"

%<np%>%<top%>:                                                 NOMINAL ;             ! Тутарстанта
%<np%>%<top%>%<attr%>:                                         # ; 

LEXICON NP-TOP-PX
! Compound toponyms ending in <px3sp>

%<np%>%<top%>:                                                 POSS ;

LEXICON NP-TOP-PL
! Plural toponyms like Филиппинсем

%<np%>%<top%>%<pl%>:                                           CASE ;

LEXICON NP-TOP-LN
! Lexicon for toponyms with alternative locative in -рA (in addition to -TA).
! These are words ending in н or нь, and often also the ones ending in л or ль.

                                                               NP-TOP ;
%<np%>%<top%>%<loc%>:%>р%{A%}                                  K "weight: 1.0" ; 
%<np%>%<top%>%<abl%>:%>р%{A%}н                                 K "weight: 1.0" ; 
%<np%>%<top%>%<px2sg%>%<dat%>:%>н%{A%}                         K "weight: 1.0" ; 

LEXICON NP-TOP-BERLIN
! Russian toponyms ending in н or нь, especially for those
! whose last vowel is front

:%{ъ%}                                                         NP-TOP-LN ;

LEXICON NP-TOP-ENISEY
! Russian toponyms ending in ей

                                                               NP-TOP ;
:%{ъ%}                                                         NP-TOP "weight: 1.0" ;

LEXICON NP-TOP-SK
! Russian toponyms not ending in н or нь, especially for those
! whose last vowel is front

:%{ъ%}                                                         NP-TOP ;

LEXICON NP-TOP-IJ
! Toponyms ending in ий

%<np%>%<top%>:%{й%}                                            NOMINAL ;
%<np%>%<top%>%<nom%>:й                                         K "weight: -1.0" ;
%<np%>%<top%>%<attr%>:й                                        # ; 

LEXICON NP-TOP-UDMURTI
! Toponyms ending in и

:%{й%}                                                         NP-TOP ;
! These are optional spoken/informal forms.
%<np%>%<top%>%<px2sg%>%<dat%>:%>н%{A%}                         K "weight: 1.0" ;	! Dir/LR
%<np%>%<top%>%<px3sp%>%<dat%>:%{ă%}%>н%{A%}                    K "weight: 1.0" ;	! Dir/LR
%<np%>%<top%>%<px3sp%>%<loc%>:%>нче                            K "weight: 1.0" ;           ! территоринче	! Dir/LR
%<np%>%<top%>%<px3sp%>%<loc%>:%>нчен                           K "weight: 1.0" ;           ! территоринчен	! Dir/LR
%<np%>%<top%>%<px3sp%>%<loc%>%<attr%>:%>нчи                    K "weight: 1.0" ;           ! территоринчи	! Dir/LR
%<np%>%<top%>%<px3sp%>%<loc%>%<subst%>:%>нчи                   NOMINAL "weight: 1.0" ;     ! территоринчи	! Dir/LR


LEXICON NP-ANT-F

%<np%>%<ant%>%<f%>:                                            NOMINAL ;

LEXICON NP-ANT-M

%<np%>%<ant%>%<m%>:                                            NOMINAL ;

LEXICON NP-ANT-M-LN

                                                               NP-ANT-M ;
%<np%>%<ant%>%<m%>%<loc%>:%>р%{A%}                             K "weight: 1.0" ; 
%<np%>%<ant%>%<m%>%<abl%>:%>р%{A%}н                            K "weight: 1.0" ; 
%<np%>%<ant%>%<m%>%<px2sg%>%<dat%>:%>н%{A%}                    K "weight: 1.0" ; 

LEXICON NP-ANT-M-RUS

:%{ъ%}                                                         NP-ANT-M ;

LEXICON NP-ANT-M-LN-RUS

:%{ъ%}                                                         NP-ANT-M-LN ;

LEXICON Proper 
Герман:Герман                        NP-ANT-M-LN-RUS ; ! ""
Уильям:Уильям NP-ANT-M-RUS ; ! ""
Валентин:Валентин NP-ANT-M-LN-RUS ; ! ""
Джон:Джон NP-ANT-M-LN-RUS ; ! ""
Джеймс:Джеймс NP-ANT-M-RUS ; ! ""
Максим:Максим NP-ANT-M-RUS ; ! ""
Вениамин:Вениамин NP-ANT-M-LN-RUS ; ! ""
Карталсем:Карталсем                  NP-TOP-PL; !""
Клинцсем:Клинцсем                  NP-TOP-PL; !""
Красноуральск:Красноуральск                  NP-TOP-SK; !""
Лосино-Петровский:Лосино-Петровски NP-TOP-IJ; !""
Озерсем:Озерсем                  NP-TOP-PL; !""
Сенгилей:Сенгилей                  NP-TOP-ENISEY; !""
Учалсем:Учалсем                  NP-TOP-PL; !""
Хилок:Хилок                  NP-TOP-SK; !""
Армени:Армени                   NP-TOP-UDMURTI; ! ""
Филиппинсем:Филиппинсем                   NP-TOP-PL ; ! ""
Боливи:Боливи                   NP-TOP-UDMURTI; ! ""
Касаксем:Касаксем     NP-TOP-PL;!""
Нуркей:Нуркей     NP-TOP-ENISEY;!""
Ҫармӑссем:Ҫармӑссем     NP-TOP-PL;!""
Архангельский:Архангельски NP-TOP-IJ;
Би:Би     NP-TOP-UDMURTI;!""
Битман:Битман     NP-TOP-BERLIN;!""
Краснояр:Краснояр     NP-TOP-SK;!""
Мучале:Мучале     NP-TOP;!""
Перемский:Перемски NP-TOP-IJ;
Данил:Данил NP-ANT-M-LN-RUS ; 
Яков:Яков NP-ANT-M-RUS ; 
Франклин:Франклин NP-ANT-M-LN-RUS ; 
Асрар:Асрар     NP-ANT-M;!""
Вилюр:Вилюр     NP-ANT-M;!""
Василь:Василь     NP-ANT-M-LN;!""
Джалаль:Джалаль     NP-ANT-M-LN;!""
Исанмухаммет:Исанмухаммет     NP-ANT-M;!""
Ишкиль:Ишкиль     NP-ANT-M-LN;!""
Минлевасиль:Минлевасиль     NP-ANT-M-LN;!""
Маннаф:Маннаф     NP-ANT-M;!""
Рамзиль:Рамзиль     NP-ANT-M-LN;!""
Сардар:Сардар     NP-ANT-M;!""
Фанзиль:Фанзиль     NP-ANT-M-LN;!""
Ханбал:Ханбал     NP-ANT-M;!""
Валима:Валима     NP-ANT-F;!""
Закира:Закира     NP-ANT-F;!""
Михрисылу:Михрисылу     NP-ANT-F;!""
Унса:Унса     NP-ANT-F;!""
Фирдавес:Фирдавес     NP-ANT-F;!""
Августина:Августин%{а%}     NP-ANT-F;!""
Хавал:Хавал NP-AL ; ! ""
Верей:Верей NP-TOP-ENISEY ; ! ""
Ҫавал:Ҫавал NP-TOP-LN; ! ""
Правда:Правд%{а%} NP-AL ; ! ""
Роспотребнадзор:Роспотребнадзор NP-AL ; ! ""
Россельхознадзор:Россельхознадзор NP-AL ; ! ""
Фейсбук:Фейсбук NP-AL ; ! ""
Твиттер:Твиттер%{ъ%} NP-AL ; ! ""
Самант:Самант NP-AL ; ! ""
Ҫамрӑксен% хаҫачĕ:Ҫамрӑксен% хаҫачĕ NP-AL-PX ; ! ""
Чӑваш% хӗрарӑмӗ:Чӑваш% хӗрарӑмӗ NP-AL-PX ; ! ""
Хресчен% сасси:Хресчен% сасси NP-AL-PX ; ! ""
Вадим:Вадим NP-ANT-M-RUS ; ! ""
Олег:Олег NP-ANT-M-RUS ; ! ""
Айдарали:Айдарали  NP-TOP-UDMURTI; ! ""
Александровский:Александровски NP-TOP-IJ; ! ""
Бердяш:Бердяш  NP-TOP-SK; ! ""
Гургурей:Гургурей  NP-TOP-ENISEY; ! ""
Катениновский:Катениновски NP-TOP-IJ; ! ""
Киндеркулево:Киндеркулев%{о%}  NP-TOP; ! ""
Прибельский:Прибельски NP-TOP-IJ; ! ""
Урмекей:Урмекей  NP-TOP-ENISEY; ! ""
Четырман:Четырман  NP-TOP-BERLIN; ! ""
Боксово:Боксов%{о%} NP-TOP ; ! ""
Бутар-Лей:Бутар-Лей NP-TOP-ENISEY ; ! ""
Варсын-Тан-Юган:Варсын-Тан-Юган NP-TOP-BERLIN ; ! ""
Вожаль:Вожаль NP-TOP-LN ; ! ""
Дерней:Дерней NP-TOP-ENISEY ; ! ""
Ильсема:Ильсем%{а%} NP-TOP ; ! ""
Калганак:Калганак NP-TOP-SK; ! ""
Каль-Пет-Юган:Каль-Пет-Юган NP-TOP-BERLIN ; ! ""
Кеджъёль:Кеджъёль NP-TOP-LN ; ! ""
Логась-Юган:Логась-Юган NP-TOP-BERLIN ; ! ""
Лун-Вож-Чути:Лун-Вож-Чути NP-TOP-UDMURTI; ! ""
Мисюряй:Мисюряй NP-TOP ; ! ""
Нин-Еган:Нин-Еган NP-TOP-BERLIN ; ! ""
Олень:Олень NP-TOP-LN ; ! ""
Рыстюг:Рыстюг NP-TOP-SK; ! ""
Тангавц-Яха:Тангавц-Яха NP-TOP ; ! ""
Ун-Логась-Юган:Ун-Логась-Юган NP-TOP-BERLIN ; ! ""
Учул:Учул NP-TOP-LN ; ! ""
Автанҫырми:Автанҫырми NP-TOP-PX; ! "Янгиреево"
Вутлан:Вутлан NP-TOP-LN; ! "Вотланы"
Елюккасси:Елюккасси NP-TOP-PX; ! "Елюккасы"
Карӑкҫырми:Карӑкҫырми NP-TOP-PX; ! "Карак-Сирмы ."
Лупашка:Лупашка NP-TOP; ! "Лобашкино"
Мамҫа% Упи:Мамҫа% Упи NP-TOP-PX; ! "Байсубино"
Никольски:Никольски NP-TOP-UDMURTI; ! "Никольское"
Пахмӑткасси:Пахмӑткасси NP-TOP-PX; ! "Малая Мами-Утка"
Темешкин% Сали:Темешкин% Сали NP-TOP-PX; ! "Демёшкино"
Хусанушкӑнь:Хусанушкӑнь NP-TOP-LN; ! "Хозанкино"
Шуркасси:Шуркасси NP-TOP-PX; ! "Шоркасы"
LEXICON Pronouns 
пӗр-пӗри%<prn%>%<ind%>%<gen%>:пӗр-пӗрин%{ː%}%>%{х%}%{и%}%{н%} SUBST ;!""
 LEXICON Abbreviations
Армагеддон:Армагеддон NP-AL-LN; ! src: Chuvash wordlist ""
Совинформбюро:Совинформбюро NP-AL-BÜRO; ! src: Chuvash wordlist ""
